Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 64.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
81-2,291
Pure Food
Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

All fees
paid to the department in accordance with the Nebraska Pure Food Act shall
be remitted to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit the fees
to the Pure Food Cash Fund, which fund is hereby created. All money credited
to such fund shall be appropriated to the uses of the department to aid in
defraying the expenses of administering the act, except that transfers may be made from the fund to the
General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

Any money in the Pure Food Cash Fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 41;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.37;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 60;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 98;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 64.
November 21, 2009
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.